Massachusetts, session 194th, H3793.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 90 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing in the 2016
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after Section 6C the following:-
Section 6D. The registrar, upon payment of the fee as required in section 33, shall furnish
a special distinctive Firefighters Memorial Motorcycle License Plate for use on privately owned
motorcycles. Said motorcycle license plate shall be comparable to the current Firefighters
Memorial License Plate for automobiles established in 2006.
Of the required fee provided in section 33, twenty-eight dollars of the forty dollar special
plate fee shall go to support the Massachusetts Fallen Firefighter Memorial and twelve dollars to
the MASSDOT for manufacturing the plate. The issuance and renewal of such Firefighter
Memorial Motorcycle License Plate shall be collected by the registrar for the funding of the
Statewide Memorial located at Ashburton Park at the Massachusetts State House which shall be
of 2

coordinated by the Massachusetts Fallen Firefighter Memorial charitable, a non-profit 501(C)(3)
corporation in accordance with section 2f(c).
SECTION 2. This act shall be known as the Dave Condon Firefighter Memorial License
Plate Act.
of 2